North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-05 Title Registration
39-05-29.
Registration of housetrailers — Provisions of chapter not applicable to trailers or semitrailers less than fifty dollars in value. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 253, § 6.

Note.

For present provisions, see § 39-18-03.

39-05-30.
Fees and revenues collected placed in highway tax distribution fund — Payment of salaries and expenses.

All fees and revenues received by the director under the provisions of this chapter must be deposited by the director in the state treasury. Such moneys must be placed in the highway tax distribution fund. All salaries and other expenses incurred in connection with the provisions of this chapter must be paid out of the motor vehicle registration fund in the manner provided by law for the disbursement of said fund.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 180, § 17; 1933, ch. 160, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 39-0530; 2007, ch. 316, § 3; 2009, ch. 326, § 3.

39-05-31.
Director may employ office help and purchase supplies.

Within the legislative appropriation, the director may employ all office help and purchase all supplies necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 180, § 17; 1933, ch. 160, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 39-0531.

39-05-31.1.
Administration of oaths.

Officers and employees of the department designated by the director may administer oaths for the purposes of this chapter but may not charge any fee therefor.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 378, § 25.

39-05-32.
Officers to enforce provisions of chapter.

The highway patrol and all other road or police officers shall enforce the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 180, § 17; 1933, ch. 160, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 39-0532; S.L. 1973, ch. 296, § 1; 1983, ch. 418, § 6.

39-05-33.
General penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this chapter for which another penalty is not provided specifically is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. This section does not apply to the department.

Source:

S.L. 1927, ch. 180, § 19; R.C. 1943, § 39-0533; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 428; S.L. 2005, ch. 327, § 4.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see § 12.1-32-01.

39-05-34.
Penalty for felony. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

39-05-35.
Manufactured homes — Conversion to real property — Procedure — Rules.

The owner or, if there is more than one owner, all owners, of a manufactured home that is covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin which the owner is able to produce and that is permanently affixed to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, or which the owner intends to permanently affix to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, may surrender the manufacturer’s certificate of origin to the manufactured home to the department by filing with the department an application for surrender of manufacturer’s certificate of origin containing or accompanied by:

The name, residence, and mailing address of the owner;

A description of the manufactured home, including the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, the manufacturer’s serial number of the manufactured home, whether the manufactured home is new or used, and any other information the department requires;

The date of purchase by the owner of the manufactured home, the name and address of the person from whom the home was acquired, and the names and addresses of any security interest holders and lienholders in the order of their apparent priority;

A statement, signed by the owner, stating either:

Any facts or information known to the owner that may affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a security interest in or lien on the manufactured home; or

That no such facts or information are known to the owner;

A copy of the recorded affidavit of affixation as provided in accordance with subsection 5 of section 47-10-27;

The original manufacturer’s certificate of origin;

The name and mailing address of each person wishing written acknowledgment of surrender from the department;

The applicable fee for filing the application for surrender; and

Any other information and documents the department reasonably requires to identify the owner of the manufactured home and to enable the department to determine whether the owner satisfied the requirements of subdivisions a through c of subsection 6 of section 47-10-27 and is entitled to surrender the manufacturer’s certificate of origin and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in or liens on the manufactured home.

When satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of the surrender of a manufacturer’s certificate of origin to a manufactured home and upon satisfaction of the requirements of subdivision a, the department shall:

Cancel the manufacturer’s certificate of origin and update the department’s records in accordance with the provisions of section 39-05-22; and

Provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this section to each person identified on the application for surrender of a manufacturer’s certificate of origin under paragraph 7 of subdivision a.

Upon satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection, a manufactured home must be conveyed or encumbered as provided in chapter 47-10. If the application to surrender a manufacturer’s certificate of origin is delivered to the department within sixty days of recording the related affidavit of affixation with the recorder in the county in which the real property to which the manufactured home is or will be affixed and the application is thereafter accepted by the department, the requirements of this subsection are deemed satisfied as of the date the affidavit of affixation was recorded.

Upon written request, the department shall provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

The owner or, if there is more than one owner, all owners, of a manufactured home that is covered by a certificate of title which the owner is able to produce and that is permanently affixed to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, or which the owner intends to permanently affix to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, may surrender the certificate of title to the manufactured home to the department by filing with the department an application for surrender of title containing or accompanied by:

The name, residence, and mailing address of the owner;

A description of the manufactured home, including the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, the manufacturer’s serial number of the manufactured home, whether the manufactured home is new or used, and any other information the department requires;

The date of purchase by the owner of the manufactured home, the name and address of the person from whom the home was acquired, and the names and addresses of any security interest holders and lienholders in the order of their apparent priority;

A statement, signed by the owner, stating either:

Any facts or information known to the owner that may affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a security interest in or lien on the manufactured home; or

That no such facts or information are known to the owner;

A copy of the recorded affidavit of affixation provided in accordance with subsection 5 of section 47-10-27;

The original certificate of title;

The name and mailing address of each person wishing written acknowledgment of surrender from the department;

The applicable fee for filing the application for surrender; and

Any other information and documents the department reasonably requires to identify the owner of the manufactured home and to enable the department to determine whether the owner satisfied the requirements of subdivisions a through c of subsection 6 of section 47-10-27 and is entitled to surrender the certificate of title and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in or liens on the manufactured home.

The department may not accept for surrender a certificate of title to a manufactured home unless and until all security interests or liens perfected under section 35-01-05.1 have been released.

When satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of the surrender of a certificate of title to a manufactured home and upon satisfaction of the requirements of subdivisions a and b, the department shall:

Cancel the certificate of title and update the department’s records in accordance with the provisions of section 39-05-22; and

Provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this section to each person identified on the application for surrender of title under paragraph 7 of subdivision a.

Upon satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection, a manufactured home must be conveyed or encumbered as provided in chapter 47-10. If the application to surrender a certificate of title is delivered to the department within sixty days of recording the related affidavit of affixation with the recorder in the county in which the real property to which the manufactured home is or will be affixed, and the application is thereafter accepted by the department, the requirements of this subsection are deemed satisfied as of the date the affidavit of affixation was recorded.

Upon written request, the department shall provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

The owner or, if there is more than one owner, all owners, of a manufactured home that is not covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or a certificate of title, or of a manufactured home that is covered by a manufacturer’s certificate of origin or certificate of title but which the owner of the manufactured home, after diligent search and inquiry, is unable to produce, and that is permanently affixed to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, or which the owner intends to permanently affix to real property as defined in subsection 1 of section 47-10-27, may apply to the department by filing with the department an application for confirmation of conversion containing or accompanied by:

The name, residence, and mailing address of the owner;

A description of the manufactured home, including the name of the manufacturer, the make, the model name, the model year, the dimensions, the manufacturer’s serial number of the manufactured home, whether the manufactured home is new or used, and any other information the department requires;

The date of purchase by the owner of the manufactured home, the name and address of the person from whom the home was acquired, and the names and addresses of any security interest holders and lienholders in the order of their apparent priority;

A statement, signed by the owner, stating either:

Any facts or information known to the owner that could affect the validity of the title to the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of a security interest in or lien on the manufactured home; or

That no such facts or information are known to the owner;

A recorded copy of the affidavit of affixation as provided in accordance with subsection 5 of section 47-10-27;

A sworn declaration by an attorney duly admitted to practice in this state or an agent of a title insurance company duly licensed to issue policies of title insurance in this state that the manufactured home is free and clear of, or has been released from, all recorded security interests, liens, and encumbrances; and

Any facts or information known to that person that could affect the validity of the title of the manufactured home or the existence or nonexistence of any security interest in or lien on the manufactured home; or

That no such facts or information are known to that person;

The name and mailing address of each person wishing written acknowledgment of surrender from the department;

The applicable fee for filing the application for surrender; and

Any other information and documents the department reasonably requires to identify the owner of the manufactured home and to enable the department to determine whether the owner satisfied the requirements of subdivisions a through c of subsection 6 of section 47-10-27 and the existence or nonexistence of security interests in or liens on the manufactured home.

When satisfied of the genuineness and regularity of the application for confirmation of conversion of a manufactured home and upon satisfaction of the requirements of subdivision a, the department shall:

Update its records in accordance with the provisions of section 39-05-22; and

Provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this subsection to each person identified on the application for confirmation of conversion under paragraph 7 of subdivision a.

Upon satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection, a manufactured home must be conveyed or encumbered as provided in chapter 47-10. If the application for confirmation of conversion of a manufactured home is delivered to the department within sixty days of recording the related affidavit of affixation with the recorder in the county in which the real property to which the manufactured home is or will be affixed and the application is thereafter accepted by the department, the requirements of this subsection are deemed satisfied as of the date the affidavit of affixation was recorded.

Upon written request, the department shall provide written acknowledgment of compliance with the provisions of this subsection.

The department may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 327, § 10.